test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_kyeppir_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kyeppir: # 1B
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Nom: [kyeppir, kyeˊver] # According to Elsa-ákku, kye´ver is wrong. Should be checked. Now this seems to have a hard-coding. 
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Gen: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Acc: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Ill: kyeˊpirân
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Loc: kyeˊpirist
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Com: kyeˊpiráin
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Abe: kyeppirttáá
    kyeppir+N+Ess: kyeˊpirin
    kyeppir+N+Par: kyeˊpirid
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Nom: kyeˊpireh
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Gen: kyeˊpirij
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Acc: kyeˊpirijd
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Ill: kyeˊpiráid
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Loc: kyeˊpirijn
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Com: kyeˊpirijguin
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Abe: kyeˊpirijttáá
